California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) For purposes of this paragraph, “occurrence” means a failure to retrieve a shopping cart within three business days from the date the owner of the shopping cart, or their agent, receives actual notice from the city, county, or city and county of the shopping cart’s discovery and location.

(g) Any shopping cart not reclaimed from the city, county, or city and county within 30 days of receipt of a notice of violation by
 the owner of the shopping cart may be sold or otherwise disposed of by the entity in possession of the shopping cart.

(h) This section shall not invalidate any contract entered into prior to June 30, 1996, between a city, county, or city and county and a person or business entity for the purpose of retrieving or impounding shopping carts.

(i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a city, county, or city and county may impound a shopping cart that otherwise meets the criteria set forth in that subparagraph without complying with the three-day advance notice requirement provided that:

(1) The owner of the shopping cart, or their agent, is provided actual notice within 24 hours following the
 impound and that notice informs the owner, or their agent, as to the location where the shopping cart may be claimed.

(2) Any shopping cart so impounded shall be held at a location in compliance with subdivision (e).

(3) Any shopping cart reclaimed by the owner or their agent, within three business days following the date of actual notice as provided pursuant to paragraph (1), shall be released and surrendered to the owner or agent at no charge whatsoever, including the waiver of any impound and storage fees or fines that would otherwise be applicable pursuant to subdivision (d) or (f). Any cart reclaimed within the three-business-day period shall not be deemed an occurrence for purposes of subdivision (f).

(4) Any
 shopping cart not reclaimed by the owner or their agent, within three business days following the date of actual notice as provided pursuant to paragraph (1), shall be subject to any applicable fee or fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (d) or (f) commencing on the fourth business day following the date of the notice.

(5) Any shopping cart not reclaimed by the owner or their agent, within 30 days of receipt following the date of actual notice as provided pursuant to paragraph (1), may be sold or disposed of in accordance with subdivision (g).

(j) For purposes of this section, actual notice shall require proof that the notice was delivered to the owner, or their agent, which may include, but is not limited to,
 telephone, mail with delivery confirmation, or electronic transmission with delivery confirmation. The city, county, or city and county shall maintain a record of that proof of delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 785, Sec. 1.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.7.5.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds that the retrieval by local governmental agencies of shopping carts specified in this section is in need of uniform statewide regulation and constitutes a matter of statewide concern that shall be governed solely by this section and Section 22435.7.

(b) (1) A city, county, or city and county shall only retrieve and return a shopping cart that is located outside the premises or parking area of a retail establishment to the parking area or premises of the owner or retailer identified on the sign affixed to it in accordance with Section 22435.1 and recover its actual costs, if the city, county, or city and county adopts an ordinance subject to the following requirements:

(A) The ordinance includes criteria for determining that a shopping cart is inaccessible for retrieval by the shopping cart owner, or their agent.

(B) The ordinance includes an explanation of how the actual costs for retrieving and returning a shopping cart will be determined.

(C) The ordinance provides for at least 48 hours’ actual notice to the owner of the shopping cart, or their designated agent, of the shopping cart’s location before the city, county, or city and county retrieves the cart.

(D) The ordinance provides that the city, county, or city and county may recover its actual costs for the retrieval and return from the owner of the shopping cart, except those determined to be inaccessible pursuant to the criteria in subparagraph (A), subject to
 the explanation described in subparagraph (B) and not to exceed more than one hundred dollars ($100) per shopping cart.

(2) The ordinance may specify, but is not limited to, at least one of the following:

(A) The actual notice provides for the specific location of the shopping cart.

(B) The actual notice provides that the shopping cart is located within a predesignated area or route, as determined by the city, county, or city and county.

(3) The ordinance may require the owner of the shopping cart, or their designated agent, to follow procedures for receiving actual notice.

(c) When a city, county, or city and county retrieves a shopping cart in response to a duly filed complaint or
 service request submitted by a member of the public, the city, county, or city and county may do either of the following:

(1) Retrieve and return the shopping cart without providing actual notice to the owner of the shopping cart, or their designated agent, in which case the city, county, or city and county shall not recover the actual costs of retrieval or return.

(2) Provide at least 48 hours’ actual notice to the owner of the shopping cart, or their designated agent, before retrieval, in which case the city, county, or city and county may recover its actual costs of retrieval and return consistent with subdivision (b).

(d) If the location of a shopping cart will impede emergency services or pose a substantial threat to health and safety, including an imminent hazard, a city, county, or city and county is
 authorized to immediately retrieve and return the shopping cart.

(e) This section shall not prohibit a city, county, or city and county from being able to retrieve and return shopping carts for no reimbursement.

(f) For purposes of this section, both of the following apply:

(1) Actual notice shall require proof that the notice was delivered to the owner, or their agent, which may include, but is not limited to, telephone, mail with delivery confirmation, or electronic transmission with delivery confirmation. The city, county, or city and county shall maintain a record of that proof of delivery.

(2) The parking area of a retail establishment located in a multistore complex or shopping center shall include the entire parking area used by the complex or
 center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.8.

This article shall not invalidate an ordinance of, or be construed to prohibit the adoption of an ordinance by, a city, county, or city and county, which ordinance regulates or prohibits the removal of shopping carts or laundry carts from the premises or parking area of a retail establishment except to the extent any provision of such an ordinance expressly conflicts with any provision of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 16, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Shopping Cart or Laundry Cart Retrieval Services [22435.10. - 22435.13.]

22435.10.

As used in this article:

(a) “In the business of shopping cart or laundry cart retrieval” means to search for, gather, and restore possession to the owner, or an agent thereof, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, of shopping carts or laundry carts located outside the premises or parking area of a retail establishment.

(b) “Shopping cart” means a basket which is mounted on wheels or a similar device generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of transporting goods of any kind.

(c) “Laundry cart” means a basket which is mounted on wheels and used in a coin-operated laundry or drycleaning retail establishment by a customer or an attendant for the purpose of transporting fabrics and the supplies necessary to process them.

(d) “Parking area” means a parking lot or other property provided by a retailer for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.11.

(a) Any person who engages in the business of shopping cart or laundry cart retrieval shall retain records showing written authorization from the cart owner, or an agent thereof, to retrieve the cart or carts and to be in possession of the cart or carts retrieved.

(b) A copy of the record showing written authorization shall be maintained in each vehicle used for shopping cart or laundry cart retrieval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.12.

Each vehicle employed for the retrieval of shopping carts or laundry carts shall display a sign that clearly identifies the retrieval service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.13.

Any person who violates the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section are not intended to preclude the application of any other laws relating to prosecution for theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 19.5. Immigration Consultants [22440. - 22449.]

22440.

It is unlawful for any person, for compensation, other than persons authorized to practice law or authorized by federal law to represent persons before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, to engage in the business or act in the capacity of an immigration consultant within this state except as provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22441.

(a) A person engages in the business or acts in the capacity of an immigration consultant when that person gives nonlegal assistance or advice on an immigration matter. That assistance or advice includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Completing a form provided by a federal or state agency but not advising a person as to their answers on those forms.

(2) Translating a person’s answers to questions posed in those forms.

(3) Securing for a person supporting documents, such as birth certificates, which may be necessary to complete those forms.

(4) Submitting completed forms on a person’s behalf and at their request to the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(5) Making referrals to persons who could undertake legal representation activities for a person in an immigration matter.

(b) “Immigration matter” means any proceeding, filing, or action affecting the immigration or citizenship status of any person which arises under immigration and naturalization law, executive order or presidential proclamation, or action of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, the United States Department of State, or the United States Department of Labor.

(c) “Compensation” means money, property, or anything else of value.

(d) Every person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall only offer nonlegal assistance or advice in an immigration matter as defined in subdivision (a). Any act in violation of subdivision (a) is a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22441.1.

(a) A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall satisfactorily pass a background check conducted by the Secretary of State.

(b) The Secretary of State shall disqualify an individual from acting as an immigration consultant for any of the following reasons:

(1) Conviction of a felony.

(2) Conviction of a disqualifying misdemeanor where not more than 10 years have passed since the completion of probation. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this paragraph. The list of disqualifying misdemeanors shall be the same as the disqualifying misdemeanors applicable to notaries public appointed and commissioned pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8200) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Failure to disclose any arrest or conviction in the disclosure form required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 22443.1.

(c) The Secretary of State shall complete a background check on every person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant who was bonded and qualified pursuant to this chapter on or before December 31, 2006.

(d) The Secretary of State shall not file a bond, disclosure form, or photograph from a person who has failed to pass the background check required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.

(a) Every person engaged in the business, or acting in the capacity of, an immigration consultant who enters into a contract or agreement with a client to provide services shall, prior to providing any services, provide the client with a written contract, the contents of which shall be prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs in regulations.

(b) The written contract shall include all provisions relating to the following:

(1) The services to be performed. Each service to be performed shall be itemized with an explanation of the purpose and process of each service.

(2) The cost of each itemized service to be performed.

(3) There shall be printed on the face of the contract in 10-point boldface type a statement that the immigration consultant is not an attorney and may not perform the legal services that an attorney performs.

(4) The written contract shall list the documents to be prepared by the immigration consultant, shall explain the purpose and process of each document, and shall list the cost for preparing each document.

(5) The written contract shall state the purpose for which the immigration consultant has been hired and the actions to be taken by the immigration consultant regarding each document, including the agency and office where each document will be filed and the approximate processing times according to
 current published agency guidelines.

(6) The written contract shall include a provision that informs the client that he or she may report complaints relating to immigration consultants to the Executive Office for Immigration Review of the United States Department of Justice. The written contract shall also include a provision stating that complaints concerning the unauthorized practice of law may be reported to the State Bar of California. These required provisions shall include the toll-free telephone numbers and Internet Web sites of those entities.

(c) An immigration consultant shall not include provisions in the written contract relating to either of the following:

(1) Any guarantee or promise, unless the immigration consultant has some basis in fact for making the guarantee or promise.

(2) Any statement that the immigration consultant can or will obtain special favors from or has special influence with the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, or any other governmental agency, employee, or official, that may have a bearing on a client’s immigration matter.

(d) The provisions of the written contract shall be stated both in English and in the client’s native language.

(e) A written contract is void if it is not written pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) The client shall have the right to rescind the contract within 72 hours of signing the contract. The contents of this subdivision shall be conspicuously set forth in the written contract in both English and the client’s native language.

(g) An immigration consultant shall not make the statements described in subdivision (c) orally to a client.

(h) Except if required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 22442.6, this section does not apply to employees of nonprofit, tax-exempt corporations who help clients complete application forms in an immigration matter free of charge or for a nominal fee, including reasonable costs, consistent with that authorized by the Board of Immigration Appeals under Section 292.2 of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 574, Sec. 3.   (AB 1159)   Effective October 5, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.1.

(a) A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall provide a signed receipt to a client for each payment made by that client. The receipt shall be typed or computer generated on the consultant’s letterhead.

(b) A statement of accounting for the services rendered and payments made shall be provided to the client every two months, shall be typed or computer generated on the immigration consultant’s letterhead, and shall display the individual charges and total charges for services and the client’s payments offsetting those charges. The consultant shall provide the client a written translation of the statement in the client’s native language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.2.

(a) An immigration consultant shall conspicuously display in his or her office a notice that shall be at least 12 by 20 inches with boldface type or print with each character at least one inch in height and width in English and in the native language of the immigration consultant’s clientele, that contains the following information:

(1) The full name, address, and evidence of compliance with any applicable bonding requirement including the bond number, if any.

(2) A statement that the immigration consultant is not an attorney.

(3) The services that the immigration consultant provides and the current and total fee for each service.

(4) The name of each immigration consultant employed at each location.

(b) Prior to providing any services, an immigration consultant shall provide the client with a written disclosure in the native language of the client that shall include the following information:

(1) The immigration consultant’s name, address, and telephone number.

(2) The immigration consultant’s agent for service of process.

(3) The legal name of the employee who consulted with the client, if different from the immigration consultant.

(4) Evidence of compliance with any applicable bonding requirement, including the bond number, if any.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3), an immigration consultant who prints, displays, publishes, distributes, or broadcasts, or who causes to be printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcasted, any advertisement for services as an immigration consultant, within the meaning of Section 22441, shall include in that advertisement a clear and conspicuous statement that the immigration consultant is not an attorney.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person engaging in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant who is not licensed as an attorney in any state or territory of the United States, but is authorized by federal law to represent persons before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, shall include in any advertisement for services as an immigration consultant a clear and conspicuous statement that the immigration consultant is not an attorney but is authorized by federal law to represent persons before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person who is not an active member of the State Bar of California, but is an attorney licensed in another state or territory of the United States and is admitted to practice before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, shall include in any advertisement for immigration services a clear and conspicuous statement that he or she is not an attorney licensed to practice law in California but is an attorney licensed in another state or territory of the United States and is authorized by federal law to represent persons before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(4) If an advertisement subject to this subdivision is in a language other than English, the statement required by this subdivision shall be in the same language as the advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 557, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.3.

(a) An immigration consultant shall not, with the intent to mislead, literally translate, from English into another language, any words or titles, including, but not limited to, “notary public,” “notary,” “licensed,” “attorney,” or “lawyer,” that imply that the person is an attorney, in any document, including an advertisement, stationery, letterhead, business card, or other comparable written material describing the immigration consultant. As provided in this subdivision, the literal translation of the phrase “notary public” into Spanish as “notario publico” or “notario,” is expressly prohibited.

(b) For purposes of this section, “literal translation of” or “to literally
 translate” a word, title, or phrase from one language means the translation of a word, title, or phrase without regard to the true meaning of the word or phrase in the language that is being translated.

(c) An immigration consultant may not make or authorize the making of any verbal or written references to his or her compliance with the bonding requirements of Section 22443.1 except as provided in this chapter.

(d) A violation of subdivision (a) or (c) by an immigration consultant shall constitute a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 6126.

(e) (1) In addition to the remedies and penalties prescribed in this chapter, a person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each violation, to be assessed and collected in a
 civil action brought by any person injured by the violation or in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney.

(2) In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court may consider relevant circumstances presented by the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The nature and severity of the misconduct.

(B) The number of violations.

(C) The length of time over which the misconduct occurred, and the persistence of the misconduct.

(D) The willfulness of the misconduct.

(E) The defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(3) If the Attorney General brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If a district attorney brings the action, the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If a city attorney brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(4) The court shall grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 574, Sec. 4.   (AB 1159)   Effective October 5, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.4.

(a) A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall submit to the Department of Justice, fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state and federal convictions and arrests and information as to the existence and content of a record of state and federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail, or on his or her recognizance, pending trial or appeal. An immigration consultant who has been issued a bond as described in Section 22443.1 on or before December 31, 2006, shall submit the fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice on or before July 1, 2007.

(b) The Department of Justice shall forward the fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and request a federal summary of criminal information.

(c) The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the Secretary of State pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The Secretary of State shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for each person who submitted information pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the requests described in this section.

(f) The Secretary of State shall not post on its Internet Web site information received from the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 605, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.5.

(a) An immigration consultant who provides immigration reform act services shall establish and deposit into a client trust account any funds received from a client prior to performing those services for that client.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Immigration reform act” means either of the following:

(A) Any pending or future act of Congress that is enacted after October 5, 2013, that authorizes an undocumented immigrant who either entered the United States without inspection or who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa, to attain a
 lawful status under federal law. The State Bar shall announce and post on its Internet Web site when an immigration reform act has been enacted.

(B) The President’s executive actions on immigration announced on November 20, 2014, or any future executive action or order that authorizes an undocumented immigrant who either entered the United States without inspection or who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa to attain a lawful status under federal law. The State Bar shall announce and post on its Internet Web site when an executive action or order has been issued.

(2) “Immigration reform act services” means services described in Section 22441 that are provided in connection with an immigration reform act.

(c) The immigration consultant providing immigration reform act services for the client may
 withdraw funds received from that client only in compliance with either of the following:

(1) After completing one or more of the itemized services described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442, and only in the amount identified as the cost of that service or those services pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442.

(2) After completing one or more of the documents listed, and only in the amounts listed, pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.   (AB 60)   Effective June 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22442.6.

(a) It is unlawful for an immigration consultant to demand or accept the advance payment of any funds from a person for immigration reform act services in connection with any of the following:

(1) An immigration reform act as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442.5, before the enactment of that act.

(2) (A) Requests for expanded Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) under an immigration reform act as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442.5, before the date the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services begins accepting those
 requests.

(B) Requests for Deferred Action for Parents of Americans and Lawful Permanent Residents (DAPA) under an immigration reform act as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442.5, before the date the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services begins accepting those requests.

(C) Requests for Expanded Provisional Waivers of Unlawful Presence under an immigration reform act as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22442.5, before the issuance and effective date of new guidelines and regulations for those provisional waivers.

(D) Any relief offered under any executive action announced or executive order issued, on or after the effective date of the act adding this subparagraph, that authorizes an undocumented immigrant who either
 entered the United States without inspection or who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa to attain a lawful status under federal law, before the executive action or order has been implemented and the relief is available.

(b) Any advance payment of funds for immigration reform act services that was received after October 5, 2013, but before the enactment or implementation of the immigration reform act for which the services were sought, shall be refunded to the client promptly, but no later than 30 days after the receipt of the funds.

(c) (1) If an immigration consultant providing immigration reform act services accepted funds prior to the effective date of this amendment to this section, and the services provided in connection with payment of those funds were rendered, the consultant shall promptly, but no later than 30 days after the
 effective date of this amendment to this section, provide the client with a statement of accounting describing the services rendered.

(2) (A) Any funds received before the effective date of this amendment to this section for which immigration reform act services were not rendered prior to the effective date of this amendment to this section shall either be refunded to the client or shall be deposited in a client trust account pursuant to Section 22442.5.

(B) If an immigration consultant deposits funds in a client trust account pursuant to this paragraph, he or she shall comply with all applicable provisions of this chapter, including Section 22442, and shall provide to the client a written notice, in both English and in the client’s native language, that there are no benefits or relief available, that no application for such benefits or relief may be
 processed until enactment or implementation of an immigration reform act and the related necessary federal regulations and forms, and that commencing with the effective date of this amendment to this section, it is unlawful for an immigration consultant to demand or accept the advance payment of any funds from a person for immigration reform act services before the enactment or implementation of an immigration reform act.

(d) (1) In addition to the remedies and penalties prescribed in this chapter, a person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each violation, to be assessed and collected in a civil action brought by any person injured by the violation or in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney.

(2) In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court may consider relevant circumstances presented by the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The nature and severity of the misconduct.

(B) The number of violations.

(C) The length of time over which the misconduct occurred, and the persistence of the misconduct.

(D) The willfulness of the misconduct.

(E) The defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(3) If the Attorney General brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the
 county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If a district attorney brings the action, the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If a city attorney brings the action, one-half of the civil penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(4) The court shall grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 6, Sec. 4.   (AB 60)   Effective June 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22443.

(a) A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall deliver to a client a copy of each document or form completed on behalf of the client. Each document and form delivered must include the name and address of the immigration consultant.

(b) (1) A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall retain copies of all documents and forms of a client for not less than three years from the date of the last service to the client.

(2) Upon presentation of a written consent signed by a client, an immigration consultant shall provide a copy of the client file to law enforcement without a warrant or a subpoena.

(c) (1) A person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an immigration consultant shall return to a client all original documents, including, but not limited to, original birth certificates, rental agreements, utility bills, employment stubs, Department of Motor Vehicle licenses with dates of entry, and passports, that the client has provided to the consultant in support of the client’s application.

(2) Any original document that does not need to be submitted to immigration authorities as an original document shall be returned by the immigration consultant immediately after making a copy or reproduction thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 384, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22443.1.

(a) (1) Prior to engaging in the business, or acting in the capacity, of an immigration consultant, each person shall file with the Secretary of State a bond of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) executed by a corporate surety admitted to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(2) The bond may be terminated pursuant to Section 995.440 of, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of, the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of, and payable to, the people of the State of California and shall be for the benefit of any person damaged by any fraud, misstatement, misrepresentation, unlawful act or omission, or failure to provide the services of the immigration consultant or the agents, representatives, or employees of the immigration consultant, while acting within the scope of that employment or agency.

(c) An immigration consultant who is required to file a surety bond with the Secretary of State shall also file a disclosure form with the Secretary of State that contains all of the following information:

(1) The immigration consultant’s name, date of birth, residence address, business address, residence telephone number, and business telephone number.

(2) The name and
 address of the immigration consultant’s agent for service of process if one is required to be or has been appointed.

(3) Whether the immigration consultant has ever been convicted of a violation of this chapter or of Section 6126.

(4) Whether the immigration consultant has ever been arrested or convicted of a crime.

(5) If applicable, the name, business address, business telephone number, and agent for service of process of the corporation or partnership employing the immigration consultant.

(d) An immigration consultant shall notify the Secretary of State’s office in writing within 30 days when the surety bond required by this section is renewed, and of any change of name, address, telephone number, or agent for service of process.

(e) The Secretary of State shall post information on its Internet Web site demonstrating that an immigration consultant is in compliance with the bond required by this section and has satisfactorily passed the background check required under Section 22441.1, and shall also post a copy of the immigration consultant’s photograph. The Secretary of State shall ensure that the information is current and shall update the information at least every 30 days. The Secretary of State shall only post this information and photograph on its Internet Web site if the person has filed and maintained the bond, filed the disclosure form and photograph required to be filed with the Secretary of State, and passed the background check required by Section 22441.1.

(f) The Secretary of State shall develop the disclosure form required to file a bond under this section and make it available to any immigration
 consultant filing a bond pursuant to this section.

(g) An immigration consultant shall submit all of the following with the disclosure form:

(1) A copy of valid and current photo identification to determine the immigration consultant’s identity, such as a California driver’s license or identification card, passport, or other identification acceptable to the Secretary of State.

(2) A photograph of himself or herself with the dimensions and in the style that would be acceptable to the United States Department of State for obtaining a United States passport, as instructed by the Secretary of State.

(h) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect a filing fee to cover the cost of filing the bond.

(i) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this chapter that govern the filing and maintenance of bonds.

(j) This section does not apply to employees of nonprofit, tax-exempt corporations who help clients complete application forms in an immigration matter free of charge or for a nominal fee, including reasonable costs, consistent with that authorized by the Board of Immigration Appeals under Section 292.2 of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 574, Sec. 8.   (AB 1159)   Effective October 5, 2013.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22443.2.
